Florida, session 2026, HB715.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
28
29 Section 1. Section 784.072, Florida Statutes, is created
30 to read:
31 784.072 Notification of imminent threat to schools and
32 child care facilities or the public; Ya Ya Alert; Imminent
33 Threat Alert.—
34 (1) As used in this section, the term:
35 (a) "Child care facility" has the same meaning as in s.
36 402.302.
37 (b) "Imminent Threat Alert" means a notification issued
38 pursuant to subsection (3) which informs the public that an
39 imminent threat exists such that the lives and safety of people
40 are endangered, including, but not limited to, instances in
41 which a person suspected of killing or causing serious bodily
42 injury to another person or assaulting another person with a
43 deadly weapon has fled the scene of the offense.
44 (c) "Private school" has the same meaning as in s.
45 1002.01.
46 (d) "Ya Ya Alert" means a notification issued pursuant to
47 subsection (2) which informs public schools, private schools,
48 and child care facilities that an imminent threat exists,
49 including, but not limited to, instances in which a person
50 suspected of killing or causing serious bodily injury to another
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb715-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 715 2026
51 person or assaulting another person with a deadly weapon has
52 fled the scene of the offense, and which advises the schools and
53 facilities to lock their doors and encourages persons in those
54 schools and facilities to remain in lockdown and be vigilant in
55 watching for and reporting any suspicious activity.
56 (2)(a) If a local law enforcement agency that has
57 jurisdiction over the scene of an incident determines that the
58 scene gives rise to an imminent threat to the public, the agency
59 must activate the emergency alert system and issue a Ya Ya Alert
60 to all public and private schools and child care facilities
61 within a 3-mile radius of the incident location and may activate
62 the system and issue the alert to any other public or private
63 school or child care facility the agency determines is at risk,
64 given its proximity to the incident, including an incident in
65 which all of the following conditions are satisfied:
66 1. A person has been killed or has suffered serious bodily
67 injury, or a person has been assaulted with a deadly weapon by
68 another person.
69 2. The person suspected of committing the offense has fled
70 the scene of the offense.
71 3. The law enforcement agency investigating the offense
72 has determined that the suspect poses an imminent threat to the
73 public safety.
74 (b) For purposes of complying with this subsection, each
75 local law enforcement agency shall create and maintain a list of
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb715-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 715 2026
76 all public schools, private schools, and child care facilities
77 within its jurisdiction.
78 (c) A public or private school or child care facility may
79 contact local law enforcement agencies to verify that it is
80 included on the list of those that will receive a Ya Ya Alert or
81 to register to be included on the list. A local law enforcement
82 agency must take a private school or child care facility off the
83 list if the school or facility requests that it be taken off the
84 list.
85 (d)1. Upon recording, reporting, transmitting, displaying,
86 or releasing information pertaining to a Ya Ya Alert, the local
87 law enforcement agency with jurisdiction; the Department of Law
88 Enforcement; any state or local law enforcement agency and the
89 personnel of such agency; any radio or television network,
90 broadcaster, or other media representative; any dealer of
91 communications services as those terms are defined in s. 202.11;
92 or any other agency, employee, individual, or entity is immune
93 from civil liability for damages for complying in good faith
94 with this subsection and is presumed to have acted in good faith
95 in recording, reporting, transmitting, displaying, or releasing
96 information pertaining to the Ya Ya Alert. The presumption of
97 good faith is not overcome if a technical or clerical error is
98 made by any agency, employee, individual, or entity acting at
99 the request of the local law enforcement agency having
100 jurisdiction, or if information pertaining to a Ya Ya Alert is
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb715-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 715 2026
101 incomplete or incorrect because the information received from
102 the local law enforcement agency was incomplete or incorrect.
103 2. This subsection may not be construed to create a duty
104 of the agency, employee, individual, or entity to record,
105 report, transmit, display, or release the Ya Ya Alert
106 information received from the local law enforcement agency
107 having jurisdiction. The decision to record, report, transmit,
108 display, or release information is discretionary with the
109 agency, employee, individual, or entity receiving the
110 information.
111 (3) At the request of a local law enforcement agency, the
112 Department of Law Enforcement, in cooperation with the
113 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles and the
114 Department of Transportation, must activate the emergency alert
115 system and issue an Imminent Threat Alert to the public when the
116 local law enforcement agency confirms that an imminent threat to
117 the public exists, including, but not limited to, circumstances
118 in which all of the following conditions have been satisfied:
119 (a) A person has been killed or has suffered serious
120 bodily injury, or a person has been assaulted with a deadly
121 weapon by another person.
122 (b) The person suspected of committing the offense has
123 fled the scene of the offense.
124 (c) The law enforcement agency has determined that the
125 suspect poses an imminent threat to the public safety.
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb715-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 715 2026
126 (4) An Imminent Threat Alert must, to the extent
127 practicable, provide a detailed description of a suspect's
128 vehicle or other means of escape, the license plate number of
129 the suspect's vehicle, or any other available information that
130 may assist in averting further harm or in apprehending the
131 suspect.
132 (5)(a) An Imminent Threat Alert must be immediately
133 disseminated to the public through the emergency alert system
134 and through the use of dynamic message signs located along the
135 State Highway System.
136 (b) If a traffic emergency arises which requires
137 information pertaining to the traffic emergency be displayed on
138 a dynamic message sign on a state highway in lieu of an Imminent
139 Threat Alert, the agency responsible for posting the Imminent
140 Threat Alert on the dynamic message sign does not violate this
141 section.
142 (c)1. Upon receiving a request to record, report,
143 transmit, display, or release Imminent Threat Alert information
144 from the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction, the
145 Department of Law Enforcement; any state or local law
146 enforcement agency and the personnel of such agency; any radio
147 or television network, broadcaster, or other media
148 representative; any dealer of communications services as those
149 terms are defined in s. 202.11; or any agency, employee,
150 individual, or entity is immune from civil liability for damages
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb715-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 715 2026
151 for complying in good faith with this subsection and is presumed
152 to have acted in good faith in recording, reporting,
153 transmitting, displaying, or releasing information pertaining to
154 an Imminent Threat Alert. The presumption of good faith is not
155 overcome if a technical or clerical error is made by any agency,
156 employee, individual, or entity acting at the request of the
157 local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction, or if
158 information pertaining to an Imminent Threat Alert is incomplete
159 or incorrect because the information received from the local law
160 enforcement agency was incomplete or incorrect.
161 2. Neither this subsection nor any other law creates a
162 duty of the agency, employee, individual, or entity to record,
163 report, transmit, display, or release the Imminent Threat Alert
164 information received from the local law enforcement agency
165 having jurisdiction. The decision to record, report, transmit,
166 display, or release information is discretionary with the
167 agency, employee, individual, or entity receiving the
168 information.
169 Section 2. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb715-00